Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1 Tennessee Housing Development Agency Act
13-23-119. [Reserved.]

Subject to title 9, chapter 20, and § 13-23-121, the agency has the power and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable bonds and notes in conformity with applicable provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code of Tennessee, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9, in such principal amounts as, in the opinion of the agency, are necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving the corporate purposes thereof, the payment of interest on bonds and notes of the agency, establishment of reserves to secure such bonds and notes, and all other expenditures of the agency incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its corporate purposes and powers.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds or notes issued or anticipated to be issued hereunder, the agency may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements and options in respect thereto, from time to time, and under such terms and conditions as the agency may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the agency to pay to or receive from any person or entity for any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

The agency may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds or notes under this chapter providing for delivery of such debt not more than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury, from the date of execution of such agreement or in the case of refunding bonds the earlier of the first date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or be optionally redeemed at par.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the agency, all bonds and notes issued by the agency under this chapter shall be general obligations of the agency, secured by the full faith and credit of the agency and payable out of any moneys, assets, or revenues of the agency, subject only to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders pledging any particular moneys, assets or revenues. The agency may issue such types of bonds or notes as it may determine, including bonds or notes as to which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the revenues of the agency resulting from the purchase of mortgages from lenders from the proceeds of such bonds or notes;

Exclusively from the revenues of the agency resulting from the purchase of certain mortgages from lenders whether or not purchased in whole or in part from the proceeds of such bonds or notes;

Exclusively from the revenues of the agency resulting from the making of insured construction loans;

Exclusively from the revenues of the agency resulting from the making of insured mortgage loans; or

From its revenues generally.

Any such bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant, subsidy or contribution from the United States, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or the state or any agency, instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, or any person, firm or corporation, of a pledge or any income or revenues, funds or moneys of the agency from any source whatsoever.

Bonds and notes shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions of the agency adopted as provided by this chapter; provided, that any such resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes may delegate to an officer of the agency the power to issue such bonds or notes from time to time and to fix the details of any such issues of bonds or notes by an appropriate certificate of such authorized officer.

Such bonds or notes shall bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, shall be of such denominations as approved by the agency but not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be in such form, carry registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in lawful money of the United States at such place or places within or without the state so long as one (1) place is within the state, be subject to such terms of redemption prior to maturity as may be provided by such resolution or resolutions or such certificate with respect to such bonds or notes, as the case may be; provided, that the maximum maturity of bonds does not exceed forty (40) years from the date thereof and the maximum maturity of notes or any renewals thereof does not exceed five (5) years from the date of the original issue of such notes.

Prior to the commencement of each fiscal year of the state, the agency shall submit to the state funding board a schedule showing the financings proposed to be undertaken by the agency during such fiscal year. Such schedule shall specify the amount of funds estimated to be required by the agency for the financing of loans for the purchase or rehabilitation of owner-occupied residential housing for occupancy by not more than four (4) families and the amount estimated to be required by the agency for the financing of loans for any other residential housing, indicating particularly the amount estimated to be used to finance facilities for the mentally or physically handicapped. In addition, the schedule shall also specify the agency's estimates of:

The amounts required to provide for costs of issuance, capitalized interest and the funding of reserves in connection with the financing of such loans;

The total amount of obligations necessary to be issued to provide for such financings and the amounts expected to be provided therefor from unexpended proceeds of any outstanding obligations of the agency or from any other source;

The principal amounts and months of sale of each issue of such obligations; and

The spread, expressed in basis points, determined to be necessary to finance the agency's operations for such fiscal year.

The agency may submit a revised schedule of proposed financings to the state funding board at any time for its consideration. If, but not unless, a schedule or revised schedule of proposed financings for such fiscal year has been submitted to and approved by the state funding board, the agency may during such fiscal year make advance commitments to make loans in the types and amounts stated in such schedule or revised schedule. However, no such commitment may be made which is not subject to the availability of the funds to be provided through the issuance of obligations of the agency unless such commitment is either:

For a loan to be made from sources other than the proceeds of bonds as shown in such an approved schedule or revised schedule; or

For a loan to be made from the proceeds of sale of outstanding obligations of the agency as shown in the resolution of the agency authorizing the application of the proceeds of such obligations.

There is hereby created a bond finance committee of the agency. The bond finance committee shall be composed of the following: the chair of the agency, the commissioner of finance and administration, the state treasurer, the comptroller of the treasury, and the secretary of state. The chair of the agency shall serve as chair of the bond finance committee, and the comptroller of the treasury shall serve as secretary. The chair shall preside at all meetings of the committee; provided, that in the absence of the chair, the secretary shall serve as acting chair. The committee shall appoint an assistant secretary to perform such duties as it directs and as may be delegated by this chapter. In the absence of both the chair and the secretary, the committee shall designate by official action of the committee a member of the committee to serve as acting chair.

Three (3) or more members of the bond finance committee constitute a quorum, and the concurring vote of three (3) members is required for the approval of any matters coming before the committee for determination. Written minutes covering all meetings and actions of the committee shall be prepared by the secretary and shall be kept on file, open to public inspection during reasonable business hours. The bond finance committee shall select bond counsel and such managing underwriters as the bond finance committee deems necessary for all obligations issued by the agency.

It is the duty and responsibility of the bond finance committee to periodically review and evaluate the performance of the agency's trustee and report its findings and recommendations to the board of directors.

Prior to making any other preparation for the authorization, issuance or sale of any issue of obligations, the assistant secretary of the bond finance committee, with the assistance of the executive director, shall prepare and submit a plan of financing for such issue to the bond finance committee which shall specify:

The maximum aggregate principal amount of the obligations to be issued;

The amount of the proceeds of sale expected to be applied to:

The making of loans for owner-occupied residential housing for occupancy by not more than four (4) families;

The making of loans for housing facilities for the mentally or physically handicapped;

The making of loans for any other residential housing;

The payment of costs of issuance and capitalized interest;

The funding of reserves; and

Any other purpose;

The estimated maturities, interest rates, redemption terms, if any, of such issue of obligations and the spread, expressed in basis points, determined to be necessary to finance the agency's operations as determined to be allocable to the issue; and

The proposed method and date of sale and, in general, the proposed terms of such sale.

Upon approval of the plan of financing, the assistant secretary of the bond finance committee, with the assistance of the executive director, may proceed with the preparation of the necessary documents pertaining to the authorization, issuance and sale of such obligations. Upon authorization and adoption by the board of the bond resolution authorizing the terms and conditions of such obligations and providing for the application of the proceeds thereof, the bond finance committee shall be authorized to proceed with the sale of such obligations on behalf of the agency.

Failure by the agency to comply with this subsection (e) shall not affect the validity of any obligations issued by the agency or the sale thereof if the resolution of the agency authorizing the terms of such obligations has been submitted to the bond finance committee, and such obligations have been sold by the bond finance committee on behalf of the agency.

The agency is authorized to provide for the issuance of its bonds or notes for the purpose of refunding any bonds or notes of the agency then outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premiums thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the redemption date next succeeding the date of delivery of such refunding bonds or notes. The proceeds of any such bonds or notes issued for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds or notes shall be applied to the purchase, retirement, or redemption of such outstanding bonds or notes as determined by the agency and may, pending such application, be placed in escrow until applied to such purchase, retirement or redemption. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending such use, may be invested and reinvested in the same manner as permitted by law for the investment of state funds.

Whether or not the bonds and notes are of such form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of the Uniform Commercial Code of Tennessee, the bonds and notes are hereby made negotiable instruments within the meaning of, and for all the purposes of, the Uniform Commercial Code of Tennessee, subject only to the provisions of the bonds and notes for registration.

Subject only to title 9, chapter 20 and §§ 13-23-121 and 13-23-122, any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or notes of the agency may contain provisions which may be a part of the contract with the holders of such bonds or notes, as to:

Pledging or creating a lien, to the extent provided by such resolution or resolutions, on all or any part of any moneys or property of the agency or of any moneys held in trust or otherwise by others for the payment of such bonds or notes;

Otherwise providing for the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any moneys of the agency;

The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation or disposition thereof;

Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of any issue of such bonds or notes then or thereafter to be issued may be applied;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds or notes, the terms upon which additional bonds or notes may be issued and secured, and upon the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with the holders of bonds or notes may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The creation of special funds into which any moneys of the agency may be deposited;

Vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the agency may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed pursuant to § 13-23-123, and limiting or abrogating the right of the holders of bonds or notes to appoint a trustee under such section or limiting the rights, duties and powers of such trustee;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the agency and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of bonds or notes in the event of such default; provided, that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of this state and other provisions of this chapter; and

Any other matters of like or different character, which in any way affect the security and protection of the bonds or notes and the rights of the holders thereof.

Any resolution or resolutions or trust indenture or indentures, under which bonds or notes of the agency are authorized to be issued, may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the agency may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the holders of any issue of notes or bonds pursuant to § 13-23-123, in which event § 13-23-123 authorizing the appointment of a trustee by such holders of bonds or notes shall not apply.

It is the intention of the general assembly that any pledge of earnings, revenues or other moneys made by the agency shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; that the earnings, revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the agency shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the agency, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Neither the members of the agency nor any person executing the bonds or other obligations shall be liable personally for the bonds or other obligations or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 10; 1974, ch. 702, § 6; 1975, ch. 320, § 4; 1977, ch. 483, § 6; 1979, ch. 442, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-2320; Acts 1988, ch. 900, §§ 15, 16; 1989, ch. 201, §§ 2, 3; 1990, ch. 643, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 253, § 17.

13-23-121. Issuance of bonds and notes — Maximum aggregate amount — Mortgage revenue bonds.

The agency shall not issue bonds and notes under this part in an aggregate principal amount at any one (1) time outstanding exceeding four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000), excluding bonds or notes for the payment or redemption of which there has been or will be set aside and held in trust either moneys or direct and general obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States, or obligations secured by such obligations, or any combination thereof, which are or will be sufficient to pay when due the principal or applicable redemption price and all accrued interest thereon and, if such bonds or notes are to be redeemed, for which notice of redemption has been given or satisfactory provision has been made for the giving of such notice. For purposes of computing the aggregate principal amount of outstanding bonds at any one (1) time, bonds which bear no stated interest rate and for which no semiannual interest payments are to be made shall be considered to be issued and outstanding in a principal amount equal to the price paid to the agency for such bonds as of the date of their sale. For purposes of determining the price paid to the agency for such bonds, the amount per five thousand dollars ($5,000) maturity amount which is shown on the official statement of each issue and which is approved by the agency, and its bond counsel, shall be used.

The fixing of the statutory maximum in this section shall not be construed as constituting a contract between the agency and the holders of its bonds and notes that additional bonds and notes may not be issued subsequently by the agency in the event that such statutory maximum shall subsequently be increased by law.

The agency will distribute funds from its programs in a manner which provides substantially proportional access to this limited resource to the three (3) grand divisions as established by title 4, chapter 1, part 2, and which will provide the optimum benefit to the citizens of the state.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 11; 1977, ch. 483, § 7; 1977, ch. 484, § 1; 1978, ch. 820, § 1; 1979, ch. 442, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2321; Acts 1980, ch. 916, § 1; 1981, ch. 505, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1982, ch. 780, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 799, § 1; 1984, ch. 991, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 121, § 1; 1988, ch. 900, § 17; 1989, ch. 201, § 1; 1989, ch. 231, § 1; 1991, ch. 466, § 1; 2008, ch. 627, § 1; 2020, ch. 766, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act amending § 13-23-121 concerning the Tennessee housing development agency, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 627.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the Tennessee housing development agency and the increased demand for below interest rate loans to assist low and moderate income Tennesseans, see Act 2020, ch. 766.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “four billion dollars ($4,000,000,000),” for “two billion nine hundred thirty million dollars ($2,930,000,000),” in the first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 766, § 2. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

13-23-122. Reserve funds — Debt service reserve funds — Sinking fund payments — Appropriations.

The agency may create and establish one (1) or more reserve funds to be known as debt service reserve funds and pay into any such reserve fund:

Any moneys appropriated by the state for the purposes of such fund;

Any proceeds of sale of bonds and notes to the extent provided in the resolution of the agency authorizing the issuance thereof;

Any moneys directed to be transferred by the agency to such debt service reserve fund; and

Any other moneys made available to the agency for the purposes of such fund from any other source or sources.

The moneys held in or credited to any debt service reserve fund established under this subsection (a), except as hereinafter provided, shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of bonds of the agency secured by such debt service reserve fund, as the same mature, required payments to any sinking fund established for the amortization of such bonds, hereinafter referred to as “sinking fund payments”, the purchase or redemption of such bonds of the agency, the payment of interest on such bonds of the agency or the payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity; provided, that moneys in such fund shall not be withdrawn therefrom at any time in such amount as would reduce the amount of such fund to less than the maximum amount of the principal, or sinking fund payments and interest maturing, becoming due and required to be made in any succeeding fiscal year on the bonds of the agency then outstanding and secured by such reserve fund, except for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such bonds of the agency secured by such reserve fund maturing and becoming due and sinking fund payments for the payment of which other moneys of the agency are not available. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, any such debt service reserve fund due to the investment thereof may be transferred to any other fund or account of the agency to the extent it does not reduce the amount of such debt service reserve fund below the maximum amount of principal, or sinking fund payments and interest maturing, becoming due or required to be made in any succeeding fiscal year on all bonds of the agency then outstanding and secured by such reserve fund. Subject to any agreement with bondholders or noteholders, moneys in any debt service reserve fund not required for immediate use or disbursement may be invested as provided in § 45-2-607. In computing the amount of any debt service reserve fund for the purposes of this section, securities in which all or a portion of such reserve fund are invested shall be valued as determined by the resolution of the agency creating such debt service reserve fund, but in no event in excess of the par value thereof. If the agency shall create and establish one (1) or more debt service reserve funds as herein provided, the agency shall not issue bonds at any time if the maximum amount of principal, or sinking fund payments, and interest, maturing or required to be made and becoming due in a succeeding fiscal year on the bonds outstanding and then to be issued and secured by a debt service reserve fund will exceed the amount of such reserve fund at the time of issuance, unless the agency, at the time of issuance of such bonds, shall deposit in such reserve fund from the proceeds of the bonds to be issued, or otherwise an amount which, together with the amount then in such reserve fund, will be not less than the amount of principal, or sinking fund payments, and interest, maturing, required to be made and becoming due in the succeeding fiscal year on the bonds then to be issued and on all other bonds of the agency then outstanding and secured by such reserve fund.

To assure the continued operation and solvency of the agency for the carrying out of the public purposes of this part, provision is made in subsection (a) for the accumulation in each debt service reserve fund of an amount equal to the maximum amount of principal, or sinking fund payments, and interest, maturing, required to be made and becoming due in any succeeding fiscal year on all bonds of the agency then outstanding and secured by such reserve fund. In order to further assure the continued operation and solvency of the agency for the fulfillment of its corporate purposes, there shall be annually apportioned and paid to the agency for deposit in each debt service reserve fund such sum, if any, as shall be certified by the chair of the agency to the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration, as necessary to restore any such debt service reserve fund to an amount equal to the maximum amount of principal, or sinking fund payments, and interest, maturing, required to be made and becoming due in any succeeding state fiscal year on the bonds of the agency then outstanding and secured by such reserve fund; in which case such sum so apportioned and paid shall be deposited by the agency in such debt service reserve fund.

The agency may create and establish such other reserve funds as it shall deem advisable and necessary.

All amounts paid over to the agency by the state pursuant to this section shall constitute and be accounted for as advances by the state to the agency and, subject to the rights of the holders of any bonds or notes of the agency theretofore or thereafter issued, shall be repaid to the state from all available operating revenues of the agency in excess of amounts required for the debt service, reserve funds and operating expenses.

The chair of the agency shall make and deliver to the governor and the commissioner of finance and administration on or before November 1, 1973, and each year thereafter, a certificate stating the amount estimated to be required for payment of or provision for expenses of the agency under this part for the next ensuing state fiscal year. The amount so stated for any such ensuing state fiscal year shall be the sum of the amounts, if any, estimated for such fiscal year, by which anticipated operating expenses will exceed available operating revenues that the agency anticipates with reasonable certainty it will receive during such fiscal year. To assure the continued operation and solvency of the agency for the fulfillment of the purposes of this part, there shall be apportioned and paid to the agency after audit by the appropriate state official on vouchers certified or approved by the officer or officers authorized by the agency, not more than the amount so stated for expenses of the agency for such fiscal year.

As used in this section:

“Available operating revenues” for the fiscal year means all amounts received on account of mortgages acquired or loans made by the agency, fees charged by the agency, if any, and income or interest earned or added to funds of the agency due to the investment thereof, and not required under the terms or provisions of any covenant or agreement with holders of any bonds or notes of the agency to be applied to any purpose other than payment of expenses of the agency; and

“Operating expenses” for the fiscal year means ordinary expenditures for operation and administration of the agency.

Subject to agreements with bondholders or noteholders, such operating funds as are available to the agency shall be deposited in the state treasury to ensure that the administrative operation is conducted in the same manner as state agencies.

Subject to agreements with bondholders or noteholders, the annual budget of the agency shall be prepared in accordance with title 9, chapter 4, part 51.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 12; 1974, ch. 702, § 7; 1975, ch. 320, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-2322.

13-23-123. Remedies of bondholders and noteholders — Trustees.

In the event that the agency shall default in the payment of principal of or interest on any bonds or notes issued under this part after the same shall become due, whether at maturity or upon call for redemption, and such default shall continue for a period of thirty (30) days, or in the event that the agency shall fail or refuse to comply with this part, or shall default in any agreement made with the holders of any issue of bonds or notes, the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in aggregate principal amount of the bonds or notes of such issue then outstanding, by instrument or instruments filed in the office of the secretary of state and proved or acknowledged in the same manner as a deed to be recorded, may appoint a trustee to represent the holders of such bonds or notes for the purposes herein provided.

Such trustee may, and upon written request of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) in principal amount of such bonds or notes then outstanding shall, in such trustee's own name:

Enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to require the agency to collect interest and amortization payments on the mortgages held by it adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, such interest and amortization payments, and to require the agency to carry out any other agreements with the holders of such bonds or notes and to perform its duties under this part;

Enforce all rights of the bondholders or noteholders, including the right to require the agency to carry out and perform the terms of any contract with the holders of such bonds or notes or its duties under this part;

Bring suit upon all or any part of such bonds or notes;

By action or suit, require the agency to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust for the holders of such bonds or notes;

By action or suit, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holders of such bonds or notes; and

Declare all such bonds or notes due and payable and if all defaults shall be made good, then, with the consent of the holders of twenty-five percent (25%) of the principal amount of such bonds or notes then outstanding, to annul such declaration and its consequences.

Such trustee shall, in addition to the foregoing, have and possess all the powers necessary or appropriate for the exercise of any functions specifically set forth herein or incident to the general representation of bondholders or noteholders in the enforcement and protection of their rights.

Before declaring the principal of bonds or notes due and payable, the trustee shall first give thirty (30) days' notice in writing to the governor, to the agency and to the attorney general and reporter.

The circuit or chancery court shall have jurisdiction of any suit, action or proceeding instituted on behalf of the bondholders or noteholders by such trustee or any trustee appointed and acting in conformity with § 13-23-120(i). The venue of any such suit, action or proceeding shall be laid in Davidson County.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 13; 1974, ch. 702, § 8; 1977, ch. 483, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-2323.

13-23-124. Credit of state not pledged.

Obligations issued under this part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability, or obligation of the state or of any other political subdivision thereof, nor a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or any other political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues or assets of the agency.

Each obligation issued under this chapter shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the agency shall not be obligated to pay the same, nor the interest thereon, except from the revenues or assets pledged therefor and that neither the full faith and credit, nor the taxing power of the state, or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such obligation.

All obligations of the agency issued under this part are revenue bonds or notes and are not general obligations of the state of Tennessee.

Expenses incurred by the agency in carrying out this part may be made payable from funds provided pursuant to this part, and no liability is incurred by the agency hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys have been so provided.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 14; 1974, ch. 702, § 9; T.C.A., § 13-2324.

13-23-125. Annual reports — Audits.

The agency may, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the governor, comptroller of the treasury, and the general assembly. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement of the agency during such year. The annual report shall set forth an annual statistical report including, but not limited to, the amount of mortgage loans made and the geographic location of the property having such mortgages; the number, size and average income of families benefiting from the agency's activities; the improved size of housing for such families; and comparison of the loan interest rates for such families with and without the agency's activities.

The annual report, including financial statements, all books, accounts and financial records of the agency shall be audited annually by the comptroller of the treasury.

All audits performed by the internal audit staff of the agency shall be conducted in accordance with the standards established by the comptroller of the treasury pursuant to § 4-3-304(9).

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 15; 1974, ch. 702, § 10; 1977, ch. 483, § 12; T.C.A., § 13-2325; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 9; 1990, ch. 1024, § 15; 2004, ch. 656, § 2.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-23-126. Authority to accept funds.

The agency is authorized to accept such moneys as may be appropriated from time to time by the general assembly for effectuating its corporate purposes including, without limitation, the payment of the initial expenses of administration and operation and the establishment of a reserve or contingency fund to be available for the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds or notes of the agency.

The agency is authorized to accept funds from any other legal and appropriate source for effectuating its corporate purposes.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 16; T.C.A., § 13-2326; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 8.

13-23-127. Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this part will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the agency is not required to pay any tax or assessment on any property owned by the agency under this part or upon the income therefrom; nor is the agency required to pay any transfer tax of any kind on account of instruments recorded by it or on its behalf.

Any obligations issued by the agency under this part, their transfer, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 17; 1975, ch. 152, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2327.

13-23-128. Conflicts of interest.

No member or employee of the agency, during such member's or employee's tenure or for six (6) months thereafter, shall be employed by, hold any paid official relation to, or have any financial interest in, any housing sponsor or any housing development financed or assisted by the agency.

No real property to which such member or employee holds legal title or in which such person has any financial interest shall be sold, during such member's or employee's tenure or for six (6) months thereafter, to a housing sponsor for a housing development to be financed by the agency.

If any member or employee of the agency has a direct or indirect interest in any other business or contract with the agency other than those described in subsection (a), or has an ownership interest in any firm, corporation, or other entity having an interest in any business or contracts with the agency other than those described in subsection (a), such interest must be disclosed in writing and set forth in the official minutes of the agency, and such member or employee must refrain from participation in any discussion or activity by the agency in connection with such business or contract.

If any member or employee fails to comply with the foregoing provisions, such member or employee may, after proper notification and opportunity to be heard, be disqualified from membership with or employment by the agency by a majority vote of the board of directors and may not be reappointed to or reemployed by the agency.

In no event shall any failure to comply with this section affect the validity of the authorization, issuance, or sale of bonds or notes by the agency under this part.

Subsection (a) does not apply to any interest, relation, or sale disclosed by a member or employee prior to January 1, 1979, and made a part of the minutes of the agency in accordance with the then applicable law.

No state officer or employee shall, during such state officer's or employee's term of service or employment, or within a period of six (6) months after ceasing to be a state officer or employee, have any financial interest, directly or indirectly, in any firm, corporation, association or other organization engaged in any way in any housing program under the terms of this part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any state officer or employee, except officers and employees of the Tennessee housing development agency, whose financial interest, either directly or indirectly, is with or through a lender as defined in § 13-23-103, is not in violation of this section, except as otherwise specifically prohibited by law. The exception granted by this subsection (f) also applies to a constitutional officer of this state when one is acting as an individual and not in an official capacity, even though such an officer may be a director of the Tennessee housing development agency.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 18; 1979, ch. 442, § 5; T.C.A., § 13-2328; Acts 1982, ch. 724, § 1; 2004, ch. 444, §§ 1-3; 2013, ch. 405, §§ 1, 2.

13-23-129. Bonds and notes as legal investments.

The bonds and notes of the agency are hereby made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on insurance business, all banks, bankers, trust companies, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment banking companies and other persons carrying on an investment banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest in the bonds and notes of the agency funds including capital in their own control or belonging to them. The bonds and notes are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and may be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or notes or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

Acts 1974, ch. 702, § 11; T.C.A., § 13-2329.

13-23-130. Supplemental nature.

This part is deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the activities authorized thereby and is regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 19; T.C.A., § 13-2330.

13-23-131. Inconsistencies with other laws.

Insofar as this part is inconsistent with any other law, general, special, or local, this part is controlling.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 20; T.C.A., § 13-2331.

13-23-132. Construction.

This part, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 21; T.C.A., § 13-2332.

13-23-133. False statements intended to influence participation in agency programs — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make, utter, or publish a false statement of substance or aid or abet another person in making, uttering, or publishing a false statement of substance for the purpose of influencing the agency to allow participation in any of its programs.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1977, ch. 483, § 10; T.C.A., § 13-2333; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1993, ch. 278, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.